Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202086-144
Rate list filing requirements.

Telecommunications companies shall file rate lists for telecommunications service. The rate lists shall be effective after (1) ten days' notice to the commission or (2) for basic local exchange rate increases, at least sixty days' notice to the commission and all impacted subscribers. Upon written notice to the commission, a telecommunications company may withdraw any rate list, tariff, or contract not required to be filed under this section if the telecommunications company posts the rates, terms, and conditions of its telecommunications service on the company's website.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 43;

Laws 2011, LB257, § 2;

Laws 2019, LB462, § 22.